test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AA_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - gatáa - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AA

     gatáa+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: gatáa
     gatáa+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáaga
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa
     gatáa+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáagang
     gatáa+V+DIRECT+PAST: gatáagan
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáagaa
     gatáa+V+INDIRECT+PAST: gatáagaan
     gatáa+V+RELATIVE: gatáas
     gatáa+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gatáagaas
     gatáa+V+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa.ang
     gatáa+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gatáagaa.ang
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáagang
     gatáa+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáaganggang
     gatáa+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gatáagangang
     gatáa+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáagiinii
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáagaangaa
     gatáa+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáagaangaan
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gatáaäsaa
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gatáaäs
     gatáa+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gatáaäsaang
     gatáa+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gatáaäsga
     gatáa+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gatáaäsaas
     gatáa+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gatáaäsaa.ang
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     gatáa+V+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     gatáa+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     gatáa+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     gatáa+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'uuj
     gatáa+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'uujang
     gatáa+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gatáaäsaa'uujang
     gatáa+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gatáa'us
     gatáa+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'ujaa
     gatáa+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'uujaangaa
     gatáa+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gatáaäsaa'us
     gatáa+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gatáa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+CERTAIN+PAST: gatáa'ahlanggan
     gatáa+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ahlanggiinii
     gatáa+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gatáaäsaa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gatáa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: gatáagaa'ahlang
     gatáa+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gatáagaa'ahlanggaa
     gatáa+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gatáagaa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+REFLEXIVE: gatáa'ahl
     gatáa+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gatáaäseehl
     gatáa+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: gatáa'uu
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'waa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'waa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'waang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: gatáa'wägan
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'aawaa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: gatáa'aawaan
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: gatáa'waas
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gatáa'aawaas
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'waa.ang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'aawaa.ang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáagang'waa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáagang'waang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gatáagang'waa.ang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'wägiinii
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'wägaangaa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'wägaangaan
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gatáa'waaäsaa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gatáa'waaäs
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gatáa'waaäsaang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gatáa'waaäsga
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gatáa'waaäsaas
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'waaäsaa.ang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'waa'uuj
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'waa'uujang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gatáa'waaäsaa'uujang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gatáa'waa'us
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'waa'ujaa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'waa'uujaangaa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gatáa'waaäsaa'us
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gatáa'waa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: gatáa'waa'ahlanggan
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'waa'ahlanggiinii
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gatáa'waaäsaa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gatáa'waa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: gatáa'aawaa'ahlang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gatáa'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gatáa'aawaa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: gatáa'waa'ahl
     gatáa+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gatáa'waaäseehl
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: gatáa'ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'angga
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'anggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: gatáa'anggan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'aangaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: gatáa'aangaan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: gatáa'ans
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gatáa'aangaas
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'angang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'aangaa.ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáa'anggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáagang'anggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gatáagang'angang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'anggiinii
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'anggaangaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'anggaangaan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gatáa'angäsaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gatáa'angäs
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gatáa'angäsaang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gatáa'angäsga
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gatáa'angäsaas
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'angäsaa.ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'uuj
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'uujang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gatáa'angäsaa'uujang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'us
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'ang'ujaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ang'uujaangaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gatáa'angäsaa'us
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gatáa'aang'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: gatáa'aang'ahlanggan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'aang'ahlanggiinii
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gatáa'angäsaa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gatáa'aang'ahlans
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: gatáa'aangaa'ahlang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gatáa'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gatáa'aangaa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: gatáa'aang'ahl
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gatáa'angäseehl
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: gatáa'ang'uu
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: gatáa'ang'wägan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'ang'aawaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: gatáa'ang'aawaan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: gatáa'ang'waas
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gatáa'ang'aawaas
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'ang'waa.ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'ang'aawaa.ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáagang'ang'waa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gatáagang'ang'waang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gatáagang'ang'waa.ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ang'wägiinii
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ang'wägaangaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ang'wägaangaan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gatáa'ang'waaäsaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gatáa'ang'waaäs
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gatáa'ang'waaäsaang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gatáa'ang'waaäsga
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gatáa'ang'waaäsaas
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gatáa'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gatáa'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waa'uuj
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waa'uujang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gatáa'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waa'us
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gatáa'ang'waa'ujaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gatáa'ang'waaäsaa'us
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: gatáa'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gatáa'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gatáa'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gatáa'ang'waa'ahlans
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: gatáa'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gatáa'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gatáa'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: gatáa'ang'waa'ahl
     gatáa+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gatáa'ang'waaäseehl
